Maine, session 132, LD1468.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Continuing education. "Continuing education" means ongoing training for a
repair technician to be current with advancements in motor vehicle technology and repair
methods.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Independent motor vehicle repair facility. "Independent motor vehicle repair
facility" means a repair facility that is not affiliated with a motor vehicle manufacturer or
motor vehicle manufacturer's authorized dealer and includes a motor vehicle
manufacturer's authorized dealer or other entity within the motor vehicle manufacturer's
certified repair network if the dealer or other entity is engaged in repair of a motor vehicle
that is not affiliated with the motor vehicle manufacturer.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§2-C is enacted to read:
2-C. Original equipment manufacturer. "Original equipment manufacturer" means
a manufacturer of a motor vehicle part or other motor vehicle equipment that is used by
another company or entity that integrates the part or equipment in the other company's or
entity's product.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§2-D is enacted to read:
2-D. Original equipment manufacturer repair facility. "Original equipment
manufacturer repair facility" means an independent motor vehicle repair facility authorized
by an original equipment manufacturer to perform repairs in compliance with original
equipment manufacturer standards.
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§2-E is enacted to read:
2-E. Original equipment manufacturer standards. "Original equipment
manufacturer standards" means specifications, protocols and requirements established by
Page 1 - 132LR2052(01)

411 a motor vehicle manufacturer for the repair and maintenance of a motor vehicle
422 manufactured by the motor vehicle manufacturer.
Sec. 6. 29-A MRSA §1801, sub-§5-A is enacted to read:
5-A. Technician certification. "Technician certification" means a certification by a
nationally recognized organization dedicated to automotive service excellence or an
interindustry conference on automobile collision repair verifying a motor vehicle
technician's proficiency in performing repairs to original equipment manufacturer
standards or an original equipment manufacturer-specific certification by a motor vehicle
manufacturer.
Sec. 7. 29-A MRSA §1812 is enacted to read:
§1812. Original equipment manufacturer repair facilities
1. Original equipment manufacturer repair facility standards; technician
certification; training and continuing education. An original equipment manufacturer
repair facility shall:
A. Meet minimum equipment and infrastructure requirements under original
equipment manufacturer standards, including:
(1) Diagnostic tools and software;
(2) Welding and structural repair equipment; and
(3) A climate-controlled paint booth and refinishing system compliant with
environmental laws, rules and regulations;
B. Ensure all motor vehicle technicians of the original equipment manufacturer repair
facility have received a technician certification; and
C. Ensure all motor vehicle technicians of the original equipment manufacturer repair
facility participate in ongoing training in original equipment manufacturer-approved
programs and continuing education, including:
(1) Annual training by a nationally recognized interindustry conference on
automobile collision repair;
(2) Updates on advanced driver assistance system repairs; and
(3) If the original equipment manufacturer repair facility repairs an electric vehicle,
electric vehicle-specific repair.
2. Registration. An original equipment manufacturer repair facility shall register
annually with the Secretary of State and demonstrate compliance with subsection 1.
3. Directory. The Secretary of State shall maintain and make available, including on a
publicly accessible website, a registry of all registrants under subsection 2.
4. Inspections and audits. The Secretary of State shall conduct random inspections
and audits of original equipment manufacturer repair facilities to ensure compliance with
this section and respond to a complaint about an original equipment manufacturer repair
facility by a member of the public.
5. Penalties. A person in violation of this section is subject to:
A. A penalty of up to $5,000 per violation;
Page 2 - 132LR2052(01)

B. An order by the Secretary of State for mandatory corrective action and a timeline
for compliance; and
C. Revocation of registration for repeated violations.
The Secretary of State shall establish an appeals process for a person subject to a penalty
or finding of noncompliance under this subsection.
6. Rules. The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 8. Secretary of State to adopt rules for original equipment
manufacturer repair facilities. By January 1, 2026, the Secretary of State, in
consultation with stakeholders and other interested parties, shall adopt rules under the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 29-A, section 1812, subsection 6, including:
1. Defining acceptable certifications and training programs;
2. Establishing clear criteria for facility audits and inspections; and
3. Developing an appeals process for a facility contesting a penalty or finding of
noncompliance.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.